Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-12] Conduct of examinations.
(a) Upon determining that an examination under section 431C-11 should be
conducted, the commissioner shall issue an examination warrant appointing one
or more examiners to perform the examination and instructing them as to the
scope of the examination. In conducting the examination, the examiner shall
use methods common to the examination of any life settlement licensee and shall
use the guidelines and procedures set forth in an examiners' handbook adopted
by a national organization.

(b) Every licensee or person from whom
information is sought, including its officers, directors, employees, and
agents, shall provide to the examiners timely, convenient, and free access at
all reasonable hours at its offices to all books, records, accounts, papers,
documents, assets, and computer or other recordings relating to the property,
assets, business, and affairs of the licensee being examined. The officers,
directors, employees, and agents of the licensee or person shall facilitate the
examination and aid in the examination so far as it is in their power to do
so. The refusal of a licensee, by its officers, directors, employees, or
agents, to submit to examination or to comply with any reasonable written
request of the commissioner shall be grounds for suspension or refusal of, or
nonrenewal of any license or authority held by the licensee to engage in the
life settlement business or other business subject to the commissioner's
jurisdiction. Any proceedings for suspension, revocation, or refusal of any
license or authority shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 91.

(c) The commissioner shall have the power to
issue subpoenas, to administer oaths, and to examine under oath any person as
to any matter pertinent to the examination. Upon the failure or refusal of a
person to obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction, and upon proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling
the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence.

(d) When making an examination under this
chapter, the commissioner may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent
actuaries, independent certified public accountants, or other professionals and
specialists as examiners, the reasonable cost of which shall be borne by the
licensee that is the subject of the examination.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to limit the commissioner's authority to terminate or suspend an examination to
pursue other legal or regulatory action pursuant to the insurance laws of this State.
Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any examination shall be
prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to limit the commissioner's authority to use and, if appropriate, to make
public any final or preliminary examination report, any examiner or licensee
work papers or other documents, or any other information discovered or
developed during the course of any examination in the furtherance of any legal
or regulatory action that the commissioner may, in the commissioner's sole
discretion, deem appropriate. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next